District of Columbia statutes.
47-1015

Oak Hill Cemetery Company.

The property owned by The Oak Hill Cemetery Company shall be forever inalienable by the said corporation, and shall be exempted from all public assessments and taxes so long as the same shall remain dedicated to the purposes of a cemetery.

History

Mar. 3, 1849, 9 Stat. 775, ch. 128, § 10
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1015.
1973 Ed., § 47-808.